Utah statutes.
26-29-2.   Purpose of chapter.

(1)  This chapter is concerned with nonambulatory disabilities, semiambulatory disabilities, sight disabilities, hearing disabilities, disabilities of incoordination, and aging.

(2)  It is intended to make all buildings and facilities covered by this chapter accessible to, and functional for, persons with a physical disability.

